Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 150.9, as
amended by Section 583, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (74 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 150.9), is amended to read as follows:
Section 150.9. A. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation
shall procure, file, and maintain criminal history records for each
person subject to mandatory reporting as provided by law, including
photographs, descriptions, fingerprints, measurements, and other
pertinent information relating to such persons. It shall be the
duty of law enforcement officers and agencies, sheriffs, police,
courts, judicial officials, district attorneys, and the persons in
charge of any state correctional facility or institution to furnish
criminal history records to the Bureau as required by Section 150.1
et seq. of this title. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation
shall cooperate with and assist the sheriffs, chiefs of police, and

other law enforcement officers of the state by maintaining a
complete criminal history record on each person subject to mandatory
reporting as provided by law, and shall have on file the fingerprint
impressions of all such persons together with other pertinent
information as may from time to time be received from the law
enforcement officers of this and other states or as may be required
by law.
B. 1. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation is authorized
to conduct and receive results of national criminal history record
checks for authorized purposes pursuant to Public Law P.L. No. 92-
544, the National Child Protection Act/Volunteers for Children Act
(NCPA/VCA) as amended, with or without a Volunteer and Employee
Criminal History System (VECHS) waiver program or any other federal
authorizing statute. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation
shall only release the results of national criminal history record
checks to entities authorized to receive the results pursuant to
federal law.
2. Any state agency, board, department, or commission or any
other person or entity authorized to request a national criminal
history record or an analysis of fingerprints check for commercial,
licensing, or other purposes, except law enforcement purposes, shall
conduct a national criminal history records record check on all
persons of the entity authorized to access or review national
criminal history records checks information by July 1, 2009, and
within sixty (60) days thereafter. National criminal history record
checks conducted for access and review purposes shall be completed
prior to the individual receiving and reviewing national criminal
history record information and may be conducted up to thirty (30)
days before the effective date of the entity’s authorization to
conduct national criminal history record checks.
3. Each agency, person, or entity authorized to request a
criminal history record or an analysis of fingerprints shall pay a
fee to the Bureau for each criminal history record or fingerprint
analysis as follows:
Oklahoma criminal history record only $15.00 $20.00 each
Oklahoma criminal history record with
fingerprint analysis $19.00 $25.00 each
ENR. S. B. NO. 1921 Page 2

National criminal history record with
fingerprint analysis submitted
electronically $41.00 each
National criminal history record with
fingerprint analysis by mail $55.00 each
4. For purposes of this section, “a national criminal history
record check” means a check of criminal history records entailing
the fingerprinting of the individual and submission of the
fingerprints to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation
(FBI) for the purpose of obtaining the national criminal history
record of the person from the FBI. A national criminal history
record check may be obtained only when a check is authorized or
required by state or federal law.
Agencies authorized by statute to conduct national criminal
history background checks for individuals are eligible to
participate in the Federal Rap Back Program administered by the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation. The Oklahoma State Bureau
of Investigation is authorized to submit fingerprints to the FBI Rap
Back System to be retained in the FBI Rap Back System for the
purpose of being searched by future submissions to the FBI Rap Back
System, including latent fingerprint searches, and to collect all
Federal Rap Back Program fees from eligible agencies wishing to
participate and remit such fees to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation FBI.
5. Unless a national criminal history record is specifically
requested, a fingerprint analysis shall be limited to only those
records available at the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation.
Following receipt of the appropriate fee, the Bureau shall provide,
as soon as possible, the criminal history record requested;
provided, however, it shall be the duty and responsibility of the
requesting authority to evaluate the criminal history record as such
record may apply to a specific purpose or intent. An individual may
submit a certified court record showing that a charge was dismissed
or a certified copy of a gubernatorial pardon to the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation, and upon verification of that record, the
Bureau records shall reflect the dismissal of that charge.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1921 Page 3

C. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation may maintain an
identification file, including fingerprint impressions, on any
person under eighteen (18) years of age who is arrested or subject
to criminal or juvenile delinquency proceedings, provided all such
information shall be confidential and shall only be made available
to the Bureau and other law enforcement agencies. Whenever a
fingerprint impression or other identification information is
submitted to the Bureau on a person under eighteen (18) years of
age, the Bureau may retain and file such fingerprint and
identification information for identification purposes only. The
Bureau shall ensure that the information received and maintained for
identification purposes on persons under eighteen (18) years of age
shall be handled and processed with great care to keep such
information confidential from the general public. The Bureau may
receive and maintain the fingerprints and other identification
information on any person under eighteen (18) years of age believed
to be the subject of a runaway, missing, or abduction investigation,
for identification purposes at the request of a parent, guardian, or
legal custodian of the person.
D. Any person who knowingly procures, utters, or offers any
false, forged, or materially altered criminal history record shall
be guilty of a Class D1 felony offense and upon conviction shall be
punished by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through F
of Section 20N of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or by a fine
not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such
fine and imprisonment and fine.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1921 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 17th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1921 Page 5